Hawaii, session 2026, GM1158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that small boat harbors
and boating facilities are some of the most heavily used
facilities in the State, for commercial and non-commercial use
and by residents and tourists alike. The division of
conservation and resources enforcement of the department of land
and natural resources is responsible for enforcing all statutes
and administrative rules under the department's jurisdiction but
spends a large part of its time responding to violations in
small boat harbors and boating facilities.
The legislature also finds that enforcement efforts at
small boat harbors and boating facilities are necessary to
ensure public health and safety and to prevent vandalism, theft,
trespassing, and squatting. The legislature believes that
stricter penalties are needed to deter violators and repeat
offenders.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to clarify
penalties for violations of boating and ocean recreation laws.
2026-2508 SB2818 CDl SMA.docx
iinHriMiiiiiii!iuiU]iii

Page 2 2818
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 200-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§200-14 Violation of chapter or rules; penalty. (a) Any
person who violates any provision in this chapter, or any rule
adopted by the department, relating to [boating acci-dcnto,
rocklGoa e-r unaufehoriz-od ■ operatien ef a vosocl/—unauthej?i-zed
mooring of a -vcoool,—unauthorized -oemmer&ial^ aetivity,
unauthorized eamping »»ith-in-Gtatc omall boat harbors or boating
facilities,—animal abandonment- wirthin -stato-omall boat harboro
or boating ^aeilirtiee,—or creation of animal eolonieo within
state omall boat harboro or-boating—fa-eilitics -shall bo guil-ty
of a-petty misdemeanor and shall bo-fi-ncd not more than $1,000.]
the following shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and shall
be fined not more than $1,000, imprisoned for not more than
thirty days, or both:
(1) Boating accidents and boating accident reporting
requirements;
(2) Diver's flag display requirements;
(3) Thrill craft or vessel speed restrictions;
(4) Personal flotation device requirements;
2026-2508 SB2818 CDl SMA.docx
imiiMiiiiniiHiiiiiiiiMiiiH

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(5) Reckless or careless o£eration of a thrilJ^cra^^or
vessel;
(6) Operating a thrill craft or vessel without valid
mandatory safety education;
(7) Operating a thrill craft or vessel without insurance
coverage required by section 200-13.5;
(8) Unauthorized mooring, anchoring, or storage of a
thrill craft or vessel;
(9) Unauthorized operation or control of a thrill craft or
vessel;
(10) Unauthorized commercial activity within state small
boat harbors, boating facilities, or waters of the
State;
(11) Unauthorized camping within state small boat harbors
or boating facilities;
(12) Unauthorized access to restricted areas within state
small boat harbors or boating facilities;
(13) Serving, sale, consumption, or possession of
intoxicating liquor within state small boat harbors or
boating facilities, except where permitted by law or
rule;
2026-2508 SB2818 GDI SMA.docx
HiiiiiiniiiiiiHiiiiiiiigiM

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(14) Operating a thrill craft or vessel under the influence
of an intoxicant, as defined in section 291E-1;
(15) Falsifying a permit, vessel title, or vessel
registration issued under this chapter, chapter 200A,
or any rules adopted thereunder, with intent to avoid
compliance, or conceal or misrepresent the identity of
a permittee, vessel, or owner; or
(16) Animal abandonment within state small boat harbors or
boating facilities, or creation of animal colonies
within state small boat harbors or boating facilities.
(b) Any person who violates any rule adopted by the
department under this part regulating vehicular parking or
traffic movement shall have committed a traffic infraction as
set forth in chapter 291D, the adjudication of which shall be
subject to the provisions contained in chapter 291D. A person
found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be fined not
more than:
(1) $100 for a first violation;
(2) $200 for a second violation; and
(3) $500 for a third or subsequent violation.
2026-2508 SB2818 GDI SMA.docx 4
ilMIMinilllHIIIIIIH

Page 5
S.B. NO.
^*2
C.D. 1
(c) As a condition of probation pursuant to sections
706-623 and 706-624, or as a condition to the suspension of any
criminal penalties, the environmental court may provide that the
defendant refrain, for a period not to exceed twelve months,
from operating any vessel, including but not limited to any
thrill craft or vessel engaged in parasailing or water sledding,
in specified geographical areas of the waters of the State.
(d) For the purposes of subsections (a)(8) through (13),
conduct shall only be considered unauthorized when that conduct
is prohibited or conditioned by;
(1) Statute;
(2) A rule adopted by the department;
(3) A permit, lease, revocable permit, or written
authorization issued by the department; or
(4) A posted restriction or written order of the
department that provides reasonable notice of the
prohibited conduct.
[-(^] (e) For the purposes of this section [7—*'operate”,
"parasailing",—"thrill -craft",—"vessel",—-wat.or sledding",—and
"waters- of the State" have the same -meaning as those -termo -are
defined—:
2026-2508 SB2818 CDl SMA.docx
IBIMIilMIIIIIIIIIIUIIilll

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"Operate" has the same meaning as defined in section
200-23.
"Parasailing" has the same meaning as defined in section
200-23.
"Restricted area" means an area within a state small boat
harbor or boating facility that is designated as restricted by
the department by rule or written order, and that is reasonably
identified to the public by signage or physical markings at
points of entry, except when temporary restriction is required
for emergency operations or imminent public safety hazards.
"Thrill craft" has the same meaning as defined in section
200-23.
"Vessel" has the same meaning as defined in section 200-23.
"Water sledding" has the same meaning as defined in section
200-23.
"Waters of the State” has the same meaning as defined in
section 200-23."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
2026-2508 SB2818 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiiniiaiiiHiiiHiHnii

Page 7 S.B. NO.
• 'I p 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2508 SB2818 CDl SMA.docx 7

S.B. NO. ^2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 28th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2818, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
81-26

SB No. 2818, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives